Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-106
Kerosene; use or storage; container or portable tank prohibited.

No person keeping for use or using kerosene, otherwise known as coal oil, shall put or keep the same in any container or portable tank painted or stamped as provided by section 66-103.

Laws 1907, c. 86, § 4, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5757;

C.S.1922, § 5102;

C.S.1929, § 66-106;

R.S.1943, § 66-106;

Laws 1985, LB 441, § 5.